test/src/gt-norm-yamls/adj-2_gt-norm.yaml
  Adjective - allak: # ALLAK
    allak+A+Attr: alla
    allak+A+Sg+Nom: allak
    allak+A+Sg+Acc: allagav
    allak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [alep, allagabbo]
    allak+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [alemus, allagamos]
    allak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [alebut, allagappot]
    allak+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [alemusát, allagabmusit]
    allak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [alebusj, allagappusj]
    allak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [alebuttjat, allagapputjit]
    allak+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: allagit
    allak+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: allavuohta

  Adjective - gåbddåk: # GÅBDDÅK Even syll comp
    gåbddåk+A+Attr: gåbddå
    gåbddåk+A+Sg+Nom: gåbddåk
    gåbddåk+A+Sg+Acc: gåbddågav
    gåbddåk+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gåbdep
    gåbddåk+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gåbdemus
    gåbddåk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [gåbdebut, gåbddågappot]
    gåbddåk+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [gåbdemusát, gåbddågabmusit]
    gåbddåk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: gåbdebusj
    gåbddåk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gåbdebuttjat
    gåbddåk+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gåbddågit
    gåbddåk+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: gåbddåvuohta

  Adjective - stuorak: # STUORAK
    stuorak+A+Attr: [stuor, stuorra]
    stuorak+A+Sg+Nom: stuorak
    stuorak+A+Sg+Acc: stuoragav
    stuorak+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: stuoráp
    stuorak+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: stuorámus
    stuorak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: stuorábut
    stuorak+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: stuorámusát
    stuorak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: stuorábusj
    stuorak+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: stuorábuttjat
    stuorak+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: stuoragit
    stuorak+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [stuorravuohta, stuorvuohta]

  Adjective - måjdås: # 
    måjdås+A+Attr: []
    måjdås+A+Sg+Nom: måjdås
    måjdås+A+Sg+Com: måjddåsijn
    måjdås+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: måjddåsabbo
    måjdås+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: måjddåsamos
    måjdås+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: måjddåsappot
    måjdås+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: måjddåsabmusit
    måjdås+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: måjddåsappusj
    måjdås+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: måjddåsapputjit
    måjdås+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: måjddåsit
    måjdås+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - rihtsok: # RIHTSOK and LEXATTR
    rihtsok+A+Attr: rihtso
    rihtsok+A+Sg+Nom: rihtsok
    rihtsok+A+Sg+Com: rihtsogijn
    rihtsok+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: rihtsogabbo
    rihtsok+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: rihtsogamos
    rihtsok+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: rihtsogappot
    rihtsok+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: rihtsogabmusit
    rihtsok+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: rihtsogappusj
    rihtsok+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: rihtsogapputjit
    rihtsok+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: rihtsogit
    rihtsok+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: rihtsovuohta

  Adjective - gårrat: # 
    gårrat+A+Attr: goarris
    gårrat+A+Sg+Nom: gårrat
    gårrat+A+Sg+Com: gårradijn
    gårrat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gårradabbo
    gårrat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gårradamos
    gårrat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gårradappot
    gårrat+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gårradabmusit
    gårrat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: gårradappusj
    gårrat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gårradapputjit
    gårrat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gårradit
    gårrat+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: goarrisvuohta

  Adjective - smávuk: # SJÆVNNJAT
    smávuk+A+Attr: []
    smávuk+A+Sg+Nom: smávuk
    smávuk+A+Sg+Gen: smávuga
    smávuk+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: smávugabbo
    smávuk+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: smávugamos
    smávuk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: smávugappot
    smávuk+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: smávugabmusit
    smávuk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: smávugappusj
    smávuk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: smávugapputjit
    smávuk+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: smávugit
    smávuk+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - sjævnnjat: # 
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr: sjievnnjis
    sjævnnjat+A+Sg+Nom: [sjævnnjat, sjävnnjat]
    sjævnnjat+A+Sg+Gen: [sjævnnjada, sjävnnjada]
    sjævnnjat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [sjævnnjadabbo, sjävnnjadabbo]
    sjævnnjat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [sjævnnjadamos, sjävnnjadamos]
    sjævnnjat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sjævnnjadappot, sjävnnjadappot]
    sjævnnjat+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sjævnnjadabmusit, sjävnnjadabmusit]
    sjævnnjat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [sjævnnjadappusj, sjävnnjadappusj]
    sjævnnjat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sjævnnjadapputjit, sjävnnjadapputjit]
    sjævnnjat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sjævnnjadit, sjävnnjadit] 
    sjævnnjat+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: sjievnnjisvuohta

  Adjective - bahák: # SJÆVNNJAT
    bahák+A+Attr: []
    bahák+A+Sg+Nom: bahák
    bahák+A+Sg+Gen: bahága
 
  Adjective - másjket: # SJÆVNNJAT
    másjket+A+Attr: mássjkis
    másjket+A+Sg+Nom: másjket
    másjket+A+Sg+Gen: másjkeda 

  Adjective - gålmaktes: # 
    gålmaktes+A+Attr: gålmaktes
    gålmaktes+A+Sg+Nom: gålmaktes
    gålmaktes+A+Sg+Gen: [gålmaktása, gålmaktá] 

  Adjective - viekses: # 
    viekses+A+Attr: viekses
    viekses+A+Sg+Nom: viekses
    viekses+A+Sg+Gen: [væksása, väksása, väksá, væksá]
 
  Adjective - snjiltjas: # SJÆVNNJAT
    snjiltjas+A+Attr: []
    snjiltjas+A+Sg+Nom: [snjiltjas, sjnjiltjas]
    snjiltjas+A+Sg+Gen: [snjiltjasa, sjnjiltjasa]

  Adjective - gasuk: # SJÆVNNJAT
    gasuk+A+Attr: gassa
    gasuk+A+Sg+Nom: gasuk
    gasuk+A+Sg+Gen: gasuga
    gasuk+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gasugabbo
    gasuk+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gasugamos
    gasuk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gasugappot
    gasuk+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gasugabmusit
    gasuk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: gasugappusj
    gasuk+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gasugapputjit
    gasuk+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gasugit
    gasuk+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: gassavuohta

  Adjective - gutjel: # MÅJDÅS and LExattr
    gutjel+A+Attr: gutjelis
    gutjel+A+Sg+Nom: gutjel
    gutjel+A+Sg+Gen: guhtjála
    gutjel+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: guhtjálabbo
    gutjel+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: guhtjálamos
    gutjel+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guhtjálappot
    gutjel+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guhtjálabmusit
    gutjel+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: guhtjálappusj
    gutjel+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guhtjálapputjit
    gutjel+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guhtjálit
    gutjel+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: gutjelisvuohta

  Adjective - gábmat: # 
    gábmat+A+Attr: gábbmis
    gábmat+A+Sg+Nom: gábmat
    gábmat+A+Sg+Acc: gábmadav
    gábmat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gábmadabbo
    gábmat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gábmadamos
    gábmat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: gábmadappusj
    gábmat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gábmadit
    gábmat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gábmadapputjit
    gábmat+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: gábbmisvuohta

  Adjective - njárbbat: # 
    njárbbat+A+Attr: njárbbis
    njárbbat+A+Sg+Nom: njárbbat
    njárbbat+A+Sg+Acc: njárbbadav
    njárbbat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: njárbbadabbo
    njárbbat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: njárbbadamos
    njárbbat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: njárbbadappusj
    njárbbat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: njárbbadit
    njárbbat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: njárbbadapputjit
    njárbbat+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: njárbbisvuohta


  Adjective - tjårggåt: # JALGGAT
    tjårggåt+A+Attr: tjårggis
    tjårggåt+A+Sg+Nom: tjårggåt
    tjårggåt+A+Sg+Ine: tjårggådin
    tjårggåt+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: tjårggådabbo
    tjårggåt+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: tjårggådamos
    tjårggåt+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: tjårggådappusj
    tjårggåt+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjårggådit
    tjårggåt+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: tjårggådapputjit
    tjårggåt+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: tjårggisvuohta

  Adjective - suohkat: # JALGGAT
    suohkat+A+Attr: suohkkis
    suohkat+A+Sg+Nom: suohkat
    suohkat+A+Sg+Acc: suohkadav
    suohkat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: suohkadabbo
    suohkat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: suohkadamos
    suohkat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: suohkadappusj
    suohkat+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: suohkadit
    suohkat+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: suohkadapputjit
    suohkat+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: suohkkisvuohta

  Adjective - gilggat: # JALGGAT
    gilggat+A+Attr: gilggis
    gilggat+A+Sg+Nom: gilggat
    gilggat+A+Sg+Com: gilggadijn
    gilggat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: gilggadabbo
    gilggat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: gilggadamos

  Adjective - duolbbat: # JALGGAT and LEXATTR
    duolbbat+A+Attr: [duolbbis, duolbba]
    duolbbat+A+Sg+Nom: duolbbat
    duolbbat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: duolbbadabbo
    duolbbat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: duolbbadamos

  Adjective - vielggat: # JALGGAT 
    vielggat+A+Attr: vielggis
    vielggat+A+Sg+Nom: vielggat
    vielggat+A+Sg+Com: vielggadijn
    vielggat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: vielggadabbo
    vielggat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: vielggadamos

  Adjective - tjarggat: # JALGGAT 
    tjarggat+A+Attr: tjarggis
    tjarggat+A+Sg+Nom: tjarggat
    tjarggat+A+Sg+Com: tjarggadijn

  Adjective - jalggat: # JALGGAT, LEXATTR
    jalggat+A+Attr: [jalgga, jalggis]
    jalggat+A+Sg+Nom: jalggat
    jalggat+A+Sg+Com: jalggadijn
    jalggat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: jalggadabbo
    jalggat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: jalggadamos
    jalggat+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [jalggavuohta, jalggisvuohta]
    jalggat+A+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: jalggatvuohta

  Adjective - ruoppsat: #  JALGGAT
    ruoppsat+A+Attr: ruoppsis
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Nom: ruoppsat
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Gen: ruoppsada
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Acc: ruoppsadav
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Ill: ruoppsadij
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Ine: ruoppsadin
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Ela: ruoppsadis
    ruoppsat+A+Sg+Com: ruoppsadijn
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Nom: ruoppsada
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Gen: ruoppsadij
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Acc: ruoppsadijt
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Ill: ruoppsadijda
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Ine: ruoppsadijn
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Ela: ruoppsadijs
    ruoppsat+A+Pl+Com: ruoppsadij
    ruoppsat+A+Ess: ruoppsadin
    ruoppsat+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: ruoppsadabbo
    ruoppsat+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: ruoppsadamos

  Adjective - låssåt: # LÅSSÅT
    låssåt+A+Attr: [låssis,låsså]
    låssåt+A+Sg+Nom: låssåt
    låssåt+A+Sg+Gen: låssåda
    låssåt+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [låsep, låssådabbo]
    låssåt+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [låsemus, låssådamos]
    låssåt+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [låsebusj,låssådappusj]
    låssåt+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: låssådit
    låssåt+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [låsebuttjat,låssådapputjit]
    låssåt+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [låssisvuohta, låssåvuohta]

  Adjective - sjkernja: # TSIBTSA
    sjkernja+A+Attr: sjkernja
    sjkernja+A+Sg+Nom: sjkernja
    sjkernja+A+Sg+Com: [sjkærnnjagijn, sjkärnnjagijn]
    sjkernja+A+Der/Comp+A+Sg+Nom: [sjkærnnjagabbo, sjkärnnjagabbo]
    sjkernja+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [sjkærnnjagamos, sjkärnnjagamos]
    sjkernja+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sjkærnnjagappot, sjkärnnjagappot]
    sjkernja+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sjkærnnjagabmusit, sjkärnnjagabmusit]
    sjkernja+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [sjkærnnjagappusj, sjkärnnjagappusj]
    sjkernja+A+Der/Comp+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sjkærnnjagapputjit, sjkärnnjagapputjit]
    sjkernja+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [sjkærnnjagit, sjkärnnjagit]
    sjkernja+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: sjkernjavuohta

  Adjective - tsibtsa: # TSIBTSA
    tsibtsa+A+Attr: tsibtsa
    tsibtsa+A+Sg+Nom: tsibtsa
    tsibtsa+A+Sg+Ela: tsibttsagis

  Adjective - sájsas: # 
    sájsas+A+Attr: sájsse
    sájsas+A+Sg+Nom: sájsas
    sájsas+A+Sg+Ela: sájssasis

  Adjective - skárbak: # 
    skárbak+A+Attr: skárbbis
    skárbak+A+Sg+Nom: skárbak
    skárbak+A+Sg+Ela: skárbagis

  Adjective - dabár: # 
    dabár+A+Attr: dahparis
    dabár+A+Sg+Nom: dabár
    dabár+A+Sg+Ine: dahparin
